apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="f/ar__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adern</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äder</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äderna</l>    <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/onde__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~onde / ~onden / ~önder / ~önderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onden</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önder</l>     <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>önderna</l>   <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="farbr/or__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~or / ~orn / ~röder / ~röderna -->
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orn</l>       <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>röder</l>     <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>röderna</l>   <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ledam/ot__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ot / ~oten / ~öter / ~öterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öter</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öterna</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="mor/ot__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ot / ~oten / ~ötter / ~ötterna -->
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötter</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötterna</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/otter__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~otter / ~ottern / ~öttrar / ~öttrarna -->
  <e>       <p><l>otter</l>     <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ottern</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrar</l>    <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öttrarna</l>  <r>otter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fakt/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~umet | (~um) / ~um | (~a) / ~men | (~a) -->
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="laboratori/um__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~um / ~et / ~er / ~erna -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="heli/um__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~um / ~umet | (~et) | (~um) / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="l/us__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~us / ~usen / ~öss / ~össen -->
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="film__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ras__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="godtycke__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / # / #; no plural -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bott/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~en / ~nen | ~en / ~nar / ~narna -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narna</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="botten"><i>bott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="film"><i>film</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonde"><i>b</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="stadium"><i>stadi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__n"/></e>
<e lm="privilegium"><i>privilegi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="presidium"><i>presidi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="fot"><i>f</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="moratorium"><i>moratori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="ras"><i>ras</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="territorium"><i>territori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="spektrum"><i>spektr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum"><i>minim</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="ledamot"><i>ledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="centrum"><i>centr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="seminarium"><i>seminari</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="rot"><i>r</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="faktum"><i>fakt</i><par n="fakt/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kommissionsledamot"><i>kommissionsledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="kriterium"><i>kriteri</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="decennium"><i>decenni</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="parlamentsledamot"><i>parlamentsledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="ledamot">         <i>ledam</i><par n="ledam/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="film">            <i>film</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="miljon">          <i>miljon</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="dotter">          <i>d</i><par n="d/otter__n"/></e>
<e lm="faktum">          <i>fakt</i><par n="fakt/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="farbror">         <i>farbr</i><par n="farbr/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="husbonde">        <i>husb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="laboratorium">    <i>laboratori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="magnesium">       <i>magnesi</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="natrium">         <i>natri</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="litium">          <i>liti</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kadmium">         <i>kadmi</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalcium">         <i>kalci</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kalium">          <i>kali</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="helium">          <i>heli</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="aluminium">       <i>alumini</i><par n="heli/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="centrum">         <i>centr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="masscentrum">     <i>masscentr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="spektrum">        <i>spektr</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum">         <i>minim</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>m</i><par n="l/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="museum">          <i>muse</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="ras">             <i>ras</i><par n="film__n"/></e>
<e lm="rot">             <i>r</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanatorium">      <i>sanatori</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="sondotter">       <i>sond</i><par n="d/otter__n"/></e>
<e lm="studium">         <i>studi</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="godtycke">        <i>godtycke</i><par n="godtycke__n"/></e>
<e lm="decennium">       <i>decenni</i><par n="laboratori/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="botten">          <i>bott</i><par n="bott/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="fot">             <i>f</i><par n="mor/ot__n"/></e>
